District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.123

Certain representations prohibited.

Unless licensed in accordance with this subchapter, no person may use the words or terms “plumber,” “licensed plumber,” “journeyman plumber,” “journeyman gasfitter,” “master plumber,” or “master gasfitter,” or any combination of such words to imply that the person is authorized to perform the services of plumber or gasfitter in the District.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.123.